Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 12. Sale of Assets; Business Combinations

271B.12-010.
Sale of assets in regular course of business and mortgage of assets.

A corporation may, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board of directors:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property in the usual and regular course of business;

Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness (whether with or without recourse), or otherwise encumber any or all of its property whether or not in the usual and regular course of business; or

Transfer any or all of its property to an entity of which all the shares or all of the limited liability company interests or other equity interests are owned by the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation require it, approval by the shareholders of a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 121, effective January 1, 1989; 2011, ch. 29, § 9, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger of corporation, sale of its assets, or the like. 48 A.L.R.3d 430.

271B.12-020.
Sale of assets other than in regular course of business.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property (with or without the good will), otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the corporation’s board of directors, if the board of directors proposes and its shareholders approve the proposed transaction.

For a transaction to be authorized:

The board of directors shall recommend the proposed transaction to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the submission of the proposed transaction; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the transaction.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed transaction on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with KRS

271B.7-050

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section) require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the transaction to be authorized shall be approved by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction.

After a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of property is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned (subject to any contractual rights) without further shareholder action.

A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by KRS

271B.6-400

and not by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 122, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.12-030.
Conversion of corporation to limited liability company.

A corporation may be converted to a limited liability company as provided in KRS

275.376

.

A corporation may be converted to a statutory trust as provided in KRS

386A.7-060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
2, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 92, effective July 12, 2012.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.